California statutes. Public Contract Code
(c) A business enterprise that has received notice of decertification by an agency may appeal that decertification decision in accordance with the procedures of the agency that made the decertification decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1329, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

(a) The department shall establish and administer a computerized databank containing a list of certified minority, women, and disadvantaged business enterprises. On or before July 1, 1993, the data shall be made accessible to all awarding departments, local agencies, and the public for use in contracting for goods, construction, and services with those business enterprises.

(b) The databank shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) Name, address, and telephone number.

(2) Ethnicity.

(3) Gender.

(4) Name of the participating state or local agency that conducted a site visit, and date of site visit, if applicable.

(5) Type of ownership.

(6) Product or service categories.

(7) Geographical area.

(8) Name of the participating state or local agency that performed the certification.

(9) Any additional local requirements met by the enterprise, if applicable.

(10) A record of actions by a participating state or local agency resulting in certification denial or decertification.

(c) Information from the databank shall be made available to local public agencies and the public by the date specified in subdivision (a).

(d) The database developed to implement this section shall enable the department to monitor changes to this information and to issue any reports as may be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 168, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2057.

This chapter shall not apply to any professional services contract subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16850) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1329, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. Iran Contracting Act of 2010 [2200. - 2208.]

2200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Iran Contracting Act of 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In imposing United States sanctions on Iran, Congress and the President have determined that the illicit nuclear activities of the Government of Iran, combined with its development of unconventional weapons and ballistic missiles, and its support of international terrorism, represent a serious threat to the security of the United States, Israel, and other
 United States allies in Europe, the Middle East, and around the world. 

(b) On September 9, 2009, it was reported that American intelligence agencies have concluded that Iran has already created enough nuclear fuel to develop a nuclear weapon, and United States Ambassador to the International Atomic Energy Agency Glyn Davies declared that Iran had achieved “possible breakout capacity.” 

(c) On September 21, 2009, Iran sent a letter to the International Atomic Energy Agency acknowledging that it is considering a previously undeclared “new pilot fuel enrichment plan.” 

(d) On Sept. 25, 2009, President Barack H. Obama, joined by Prime Minister Gordon Brown of Britain and President Nicolas Sarkozy of France, stated that the secret plant “represents a direct challenge to the basic foundation of the nonproliferation
 regime” and “deepens a growing concern that Iran is refusing to live up to those international responsibilities, including specifically revealing all nuclear-related activities. As the international community knows, this is not the first time that Iran has concealed information about its nuclear program.” 

(e) The International Atomic Energy Agency has repeatedly called attention to Iran’s unlawful nuclear activities, and, as a result, the United Nations Security Council has adopted a range of sanctions designed to encourage the Government of Iran to cease those activities and comply with its obligations under the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons (commonly known as the “Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty”). 

(f) On July 1, 2010, President Barack Obama signed into law H.R. 2194, the “Comprehensive Iran Sanctions, Accountability, and Divestment Act of 2010” (Public
 Law 111-195), which expressly authorizes states and local governments to prevent investment in, including prohibiting entry into or renewing contracts with, companies operating in Iran’s energy sector with investments that have the result of directly or indirectly supporting the efforts of the Government of Iran to achieve nuclear weapons capability.

(g) On October 7, 2008, then-Senator Obama stated, “Iran right now imports gasoline, even though it’s an oil producer, because its oil infrastructure has broken down. If we can prevent them from importing the gasoline that they need and the refined petroleum products, that starts changing their cost-benefit analysis. That starts putting the squeeze on them.” 

(h) The serious and urgent nature of the threat from Iran demands that states, local governments, educational institutions, and private institutions work together with the
 federal government and American allies to do everything possible diplomatically, politically, and economically to prevent Iran from acquiring a nuclear weapons capability. 

(i) There are moral and reputational reasons for this state and local governments to not engage in business with foreign companies that have business activities benefiting foreign states, such as Iran, that commit egregious violations of human rights, proliferate nuclear weapons capabilities, and support terrorism.

(j) It is the responsibility of the state to decide how, where, and by whom its financial resources should be invested. It also is the prerogative of the state to not invest in, or do business with, companies whose investments with Iran place those companies at risk from the impact of economic sanctions imposed upon the Government of Iran for sponsoring terrorism, committing egregious violations of
 human rights, and engaging in illicit nuclear weapons development. 

(k) The human rights situation in Iran has steadily deteriorated in 2009, as punctuated by transparently fraudulent elections and the brutal repression and murder, arbitrary arrests, and show trials of peaceful dissidents. 

(l) During the postelection protests in June 2009, the Iranian government imposed widespread and unjustifiable restrictions on telecommunications services, denying the citizens of Iran their rights and liberties to free speech. 

(m) On October 14, 2007, Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger stated his intention to support “efforts to further prevent terrorism” when signing Assembly Bill 221, which prohibits the state’s pension funds from investing in companies with active business in Iran. 

(n) This state currently honors contracts with foreign companies that may be at financial risk due to business ties with foreign states, such as Iran, that are involved in the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, commit human rights violations, and support terrorism. 

(o) The concerns of the State of California regarding Iran are strictly the result of the actions of the Government of Iran.

(p) The people of the State of California declare all of the following:

(1) We have feelings of friendship for the people of Iran.

(2) We regret that developments in recent decades have created impediments to that friendship.

(3) We
 hold the people of Iran, their culture, and their ancient and rich history in the highest esteem. 

(q) In order to effectively address the need for the governments of this state to respond to the policies of Iran in a uniform fashion, prohibiting contracts with persons engaged in investment activities in the energy sector of Iran must be accomplished on a statewide basis, and, therefore, the subject is a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair. 

(r) It is the intent of the Legislature to implement the authority granted under Section 202 of the Comprehensive Iran Sanctions, Accountability, and Divestment Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-195).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Awarding body” means a department, board, agency, authority, or officer, agent, or other authorized representative of the public entity awarding a contract for goods or services.

(b) “Energy sector” of Iran means activities to develop petroleum or natural gas resources or nuclear power in Iran.

(c) “Financial institution” means the term as used in Section 14 of the Iran Sanctions Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-172; 50 U.S.C. 1701 note).

(d) “Iran” includes the Government of Iran and any agency or instrumentality of Iran.

(e) “Person” means any of the following:

(1) A natural person, corporation, company, limited liability company, business association, partnership, society, trust, or any other nongovernmental entity, organization, or group.

(2) Any governmental entity or instrumentality of a government, including a multilateral development institution, as defined in Section 1701(c)(3) of the International Financial Institutions Act (22 U.S.C. 262r(c)(3)).

(3) Any successor, subunit, parent entity, or subsidiary of, or any entity under common ownership or control with, any entity described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.5.

For purposes of this chapter, a person engages in investment activities in Iran if any of the following is true:

(a) The person provides goods or services of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) or more in the energy sector of Iran, including a person that provides oil or liquefied natural gas tankers, or products used to construct or maintain pipelines used to transport oil or liquefied natural gas, for the energy sector
 of Iran.

(b) The person is a financial institution that extends twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) or more in credit to another person, for 45 days or more, if that person will use the credit to provide goods or services in the energy sector in Iran and is identified on a list created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2203 as a person engaging in investment activities in Iran as described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

(a) (1) A person that, at the time of bid or proposal for a new contract or renewal of an existing contract, is identified on a list created pursuant to subdivision (b) as a person engaging in investment activities in Iran as described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.5, is ineligible to, and shall not, bid on, submit a proposal for, or enter into or renew, a contract with a public entity for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more.

(2) A person that, at the time of bid or proposal for a new contract or renewal of an existing contract, engages in investment activities in Iran as described in subdivision (b) of Section 2202.5, is ineligible to, and shall not, bid on, submit a
 proposal for, or enter into or renew, a contract with a public entity for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more.

(b) (1) By June 1, 2011, the Department of General Services shall, using credible information available to the public, develop, or contract to develop, a list of persons it determines engage in investment activities in Iran as described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.5.

(2) The Department of General Services shall update the list every 180 days.

(3) Before finalizing an initial list pursuant to paragraph (1) or an updated list pursuant to paragraph (2), the Department of General Services shall do all of the following before a person is included on the list:

(A) Provide 90 days’ written notice
 of its intent to include the person on the list. The notice shall inform the person that inclusion on the list would make the person ineligible to bid on, submit a proposal for, or enter into or renew, a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a public entity. The notice shall specify that the person, if it ceases its engagement in investment activities in Iran as described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.5, may become eligible for a future contract, or contract renewal, for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a public entity upon removal from the list.

(B) The Department of General Services shall provide a person with an opportunity to comment in writing to the Department of General Services that it is not engaged in investment activities in Iran. If the person demonstrates to the Department of General Services that the person is not engaged in investment activities in
 Iran as described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.5, the person shall not be included on the list, and shall be eligible to enter into or renew a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a public entity, unless the person is otherwise ineligible to bid on a contract as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2205.

(4) The Department of General Services shall make every effort to avoid erroneously including a person on the list.

(5) The Department of General Services may assess a fee upon persons that use this list to comply with the provisions of this act, in order to pay for the necessary, actual costs of creating and maintaining this list. The Department of General Services shall provide the list free of charge to any public entity and to the Legislature, upon request.

(6) A person that has a contract with CalPERS or CalSTRS, or both, shall not be deemed a person that engages in investment activities in Iran on the basis of those investments with CalPERS or CalSTRS.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a public entity may permit a person engaged in investment activities in Iran, on a case-by-case basis, to be eligible for, or to bid on, submit a proposal for, or enter into or renew, a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a public entity if either of the following are true:

(1) All of the following occur:

(A) The investment activities in Iran were made before July 1, 2010.

(B) The investment activities in Iran have not been expanded or renewed after July 1,
 2010.

(C) The awarding body determines that it is in the best interest of the state or local public entity to contract with the person. For purposes of state contracts for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, “awarding body” means the Department of General Services. For purposes of local contracts for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, “awarding body” means the representative of the local public entity awarding the contract, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.

(D) The person has adopted, publicized, and is implementing a formal plan to cease the investment activities in Iran and to refrain from engaging in any new investments in Iran.

(2) One of the following occurs:

(A) For a contract
 for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a local public entity, the local public entity makes a public finding that, absent such an exemption, the local public entity would be unable to obtain the goods or services for which the contract is offered.

(B) For a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a state agency, other than the office of a state constitutional officer, the Governor makes a public finding that absent such an exemption, the state agency would be unable to obtain the goods or services for which the contract is offered.

(C) For a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with an office of a state constitutional officer, if the state constitutional officer makes a public finding that, absent such an exemption, his or her office would be unable to obtain the goods or
 services for which the contract is offered.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a public entity shall permit a financial institution described in subdivision (b) of Section 2202.5 to be eligible for, or to bid on, submit a proposal for, or enter into or renew, a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more with a public entity if the person using the credit to provide goods or services in the energy sector of Iran is a person permitted to submit a bid or proposal to the public entity pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The prohibition described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) applies on and after June 1, 2011. The prohibition described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applies on and after July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 246.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2204.

(a) A public entity shall require a person that submits a bid or proposal to, or otherwise proposes to enter into or renew a contract with, a public entity with respect to a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more to certify, at the time the bid is submitted or the contract is renewed, that the person is not identified on a list created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2203 as a person engaging in investment activities in Iran described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.5, or as a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 2202.5, as applicable.

(b) A public entity shall not require a person that submits a bid or proposal to, or otherwise proposes to enter into a contract with, the public entity with respect to a contract for goods or services of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more to certify that the person is not identified on a list created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2203 as a person engaging in investment activities in Iran described in subdivision (a) of Section 2202.5, or as a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 2202.5, as applicable, if the person has been permitted to submit a bid or proposal to the public entity pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 2203.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the certification
 requirement described in subdivision (a) applies on and after June 1, 2011.

(2) A person that is a financial institution shall not be required to certify as provided in subdivision (a) until July 1, 2011. For any subsequent list created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2203, a person that is a financial institution shall not be required to certify with respect to that subsequent list until 30 days after that list becomes available, but shall certify with respect to the immediately prior list for those 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 30.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

(a) If the local public entity, or the Department of General Services in the case of state contracts, determines, using credible information available to the public and after providing 90 days written notice and an opportunity to comment in writing for the person to demonstrate that it is not engaged in investment activities in Iran, that the person has submitted a false certification under Section 2204, and the person fails to demonstrate to the local public entity
 or the Department of General Services that the person has ceased its engagement in the investment activities in Iran within 90 days after the determination of a false certification, the following shall apply:

(1) Pursuant to an action under subdivision (b), a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or twice the amount of the contract for which the false certification was made. Only one civil penalty may be imposed with respect to one or more certifications made to any public entity that are false as a result of a particular investment.

(2) Termination of an existing contract with the awarding body at the option of the awarding body or the Department of General Services.

(3) Ineligibility to bid on a contract for a period of three years from the date of
 the determination that the person submitted the false certification.

(b) The local public entity, or the Department of General Services in the case of state contracts, shall report to the Attorney General the name of the person that the local public entity, or the Department of General Services in the case of state contracts, determines has submitted a false certification under Section 2204, together with its information as to the false certification, and the Attorney General shall determine whether to bring a civil action against the person to collect the penalty described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The awarding body of a local public entity may also report to the city attorney, county counsel, or district attorney the name of the person that the awarding body determines has submitted a false certification under Section 2204, together with its information as to the false certification, and the city attorney, county counsel, or
 district attorney may determine whether to bring a civil action against the person to collect the penalty described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). If it is determined in that action that the person submitted a false certification, the person shall pay all reasonable costs and fees incurred in a civil action, including costs incurred by the awarding body for investigations that led to the finding of the false certification and all reasonable costs and fees incurred by the Attorney General, city attorney, county counsel, or district attorney. Only one civil action against the person to collect the penalty described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may be brought for a false certification on a contract.

(c) A civil action to collect the penalties described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) must commence within three years from the date the certification is made.

(d) An
 unsuccessful bidder, or any other person other than the awarding body, shall have no right to protest the award of a contract or contract renewal on the basis of a false certification.

(e) This act does not create, nor authorize, a private right of action or enforcement of the penalties provided for in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.

This act shall occupy the field with regard to all public contracts for goods or services with a person engaged in investment activities in Iran and shall preempt any law, ordinance, rule, or regulation of any local public entity involving public contracts for goods or services with a person engaged in investment activities in Iran.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2207.

The Legislature shall submit to the Attorney General of the United States a written notice describing this chapter within 30 days after the effective date of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

(a) If any one or more provisions, sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is found to be invalid, illegal, unenforceable, or unconstitutional, the same is hereby declared to be severable and the balance of this act shall remain effective and functional notwithstanding such invalidity, illegality, unenforceability, or unconstitutionality.

(b) The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act, and each provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provisions, sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words are declared invalid, illegal, unenforceable, or unconstitutional.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2010, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.8. Project Labor Agreements [2500. - 2503.]

2500.

(a) A public entity may use, enter into, or require contractors to enter into, a project labor agreement for a construction project only if the agreement includes all of the following taxpayer protection provisions:

(1) The agreement prohibits discrimination based on race, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, political affiliation, or membership in a labor organization in hiring and dispatching workers for the project.

(2) The agreement permits all qualified contractors and subcontractors to bid for and be awarded work on the project without regard to whether they are otherwise parties to collective bargaining
 agreements.

(3) The agreement contains an agreed-upon protocol concerning drug testing for workers who will be employed on the project.

(4) The agreement contains guarantees against work stoppages, strikes, lockouts, and similar disruptions of the project.

(5) The agreement provides that disputes arising from the agreement shall be resolved by a neutral arbitrator.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Project labor agreement” means a prehire collective bargaining agreement that establishes terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project or projects and is an agreement described in Section 158(f) of Title 29 of the United
 States Code.

(2) “Public entity” means a public entity as defined in Section 1100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 431, Sec. 2.   (SB 922)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2500.5.

(a) A state agency may use, enter into, or require contractors to enter into, a project labor agreement pursuant to this chapter that applies to a project or set of projects with aggregate construction costs in excess of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) only if the agreement also includes provisions to address community benefits. Community benefits may include partnerships with high road construction careers programs, as defined in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, local hire goals, coordination with programs that assist veterans in transitioning to civilian employment, job fairs for construction apprenticeship or preapprenticeship programs, or other methods agreed upon by the parties to promote employment and training opportunities for veterans and individuals who reside in
 economically disadvantaged areas.

(b) This section shall apply to project labor agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 61, Sec. 2.   (SB 150)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

The members of the governing board of a local public entity may choose by majority vote whether to use, enter into, or require contractors to enter into a project labor agreement that includes all the taxpayer protection provisions of Section 2500 for a specific project or projects awarded by that entity and whether to allocate funding to a specific project covered by such an agreement. A charter provision, initiative, or ordinance shall not prevent the governing board of a local public entity, other than a charter city, from exercising this authority on a project-specific basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 431, Sec. 2.   (SB 922)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

If a charter provision, initiative, or ordinance of a charter city prohibits the governing board’s consideration of a project labor agreement that includes all the taxpayer protection provisions of Section 2500 for a project to be awarded by the city, or prohibits the governing board from considering whether to allocate funds to a city-funded project covered by such an agreement, then state funding or financial assistance shall not be used to support that project. This section shall not be applicable until January 1, 2015, for charter cities in which a charter provision, initiative, or ordinance in effect prior to November 1, 2011, would disqualify a project from receiving state funding or financial assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 431, Sec. 2.   (SB 922)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

If a charter provision, initiative, or ordinance of a charter city prohibits, limits, or constrains in any way the governing board’s authority or discretion to adopt, require, or utilize a project labor agreement that includes all the taxpayer protection provisions of Section 2500 for some or all of the construction projects to be awarded by the city, then state funding or financial assistance shall not be used to support any
 construction projects awarded by the city. This section shall not be applicable until January 1, 2015, for charter cities in which a charter provision, initiative, or ordinance in effect prior to November 1, 2011, would disqualify a construction project from receiving state funding or financial assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 11, Sec. 1.   (SB 829)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9. Skilled and Trained Workforce Requirements [2600. - 2604.]

2600.

(a) This chapter applies when a public entity is required by statute or regulation to obtain an enforceable commitment that a bidder, contractor, or other entity will use a skilled and trained workforce to complete a contract or project.

(b) A public entity may require a bidder, contractor, or other entity to use a skilled and trained workforce to complete a contract or project regardless of whether the public entity is required to do so by a statute or regulation.

(c) When the use of a skilled and trained workforce to complete a contract or project is required pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the public entity shall include in
 all bid documents and construction contracts a notice that the project is subject to the skilled and trained workforce requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 347, Sec. 1.   (AB 2311)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2600.5.

The failure of a public entity to provide a notice pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2600 shall not excuse either of the following:

(a) The public entity from the requirement to obtain an enforceable commitment that a bidder, contractor, or other entity will use a skilled and trained workforce to complete a contract or project.

(b) A bidder, contractor, or other entity from the obligation to use a skilled or trained workforce if such a requirement is imposed by a statute or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 347, Sec. 2.   (AB 2311)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2601.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Apprenticeable occupation” means an occupation for which the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations had approved an apprenticeship program pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code before January 1, 2014.

(b) “Chief” means the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) “Graduate of an apprenticeship program” means either of the following:

(1) An individual that has been issued a certificate of completion under the authority of the California
 Apprenticeship Council for completing an apprenticeship program approved by the chief pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code.

(2) An individual that has completed an apprenticeship program located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(d) “Skilled and trained workforce” means a workforce that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) All the workers performing work in an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades are either skilled journeypersons or apprentices registered in an apprenticeship program approved by the chief.

(2) (A) For work performed on or after January 1, 2017, at least 30 percent of the
 skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation. This requirement shall not apply to work performed in the occupation of teamster.

(B) For work performed on or after January 1, 2018, at least 40 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation, except that the requirements of subparagraph (A) shall
 continue to apply to work performed in the following occupations: acoustical installer, bricklayer, carpenter, cement mason, drywall installer or lather, marble mason, finisher, or setter, modular furniture or systems installer, operating engineer, pile driver, plasterer, roofer or waterproofer, stone mason, surveyor, teamster, terrazzo worker or finisher, and tile layer, setter, or finisher.

(C) For work performed on or after January 1, 2019, at least 50 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable
 occupation, except that the requirements of subparagraph (A) shall continue to apply to work performed in the following occupations: acoustical installer, bricklayer, carpenter, cement mason, drywall installer or lather, marble mason, finisher, or setter, modular furniture or systems installer, operating engineer, pile driver, plasterer, roofer or waterproofer, stone mason, surveyor, teamster, terrazzo worker or finisher, and tile layer, setter, or finisher.

(D) For work performed on or after January 1, 2020, at least 60 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable
 occupation, except that the requirements of subparagraph (A) shall continue to apply to work performed in the following occupations: acoustical installer, bricklayer, carpenter, cement mason, drywall installer or lather, marble mason, finisher, or setter, modular furniture or systems installer, operating engineer, pile driver, plasterer, roofer or waterproofer, stone mason, surveyor, teamster, terrazzo worker or finisher, and tile layer, setter, or finisher.

(3) For an apprenticeable occupation in which no apprenticeship program had been approved by the chief before January 1, 1995, up to one-half of the graduation percentage requirements of paragraph (2) may be satisfied by skilled journeypersons who commenced working in the apprenticeable occupation before the chief’s approval of an apprenticeship program for that occupation in the county in which the project is located.

(4) The apprenticeship graduation percentage requirements of paragraph (2) are satisfied if, in a particular calendar month, either of the following is true:

(A) At least the required percentage of the skilled journeypersons employed by the contractor or subcontractor to perform work on the contract or project meet the graduation percentage requirement.

(B) For the hours of work performed by skilled journeypersons employed by the contractor or subcontractor on the contract or project, the percentage of hours performed by skilled journeypersons who met the graduation requirement is at least equal to the required graduation percentage.

(5) The contractor or subcontractor need not meet the apprenticeship graduation requirements of paragraph (2) if, during the
 calendar month, the contractor or subcontractor employs skilled journeypersons to perform fewer than 10 hours of work on the contract or project.

(6) A subcontractor need not meet the apprenticeship graduation requirements of paragraph (2) if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The subcontractor was not a listed subcontractor under Section 4104 or a substitute for a listed subcontractor.

(B) The subcontract does not exceed one-half of 1 percent of the price of the prime contract.

(e) “Skilled journeyperson” means a worker who either:

(1) Graduated from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was approved by the chief or located outside California and
 approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(2) Has at least as many hours of on-the-job experience in the applicable occupation as would be required to graduate from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that is approved by the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 882, Sec. 1.   (AB 3018)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

(a) When a contractor, bidder, or other entity is required to provide an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete a contract or project, the commitment shall be made in an enforceable agreement with the public entity or other awarding body that provides both of the following:

(1) The contractor, bidder, or other entity, and its contractors and subcontractors at every tier, will comply with this chapter.

(2) The contractor, bidder, or other entity will provide to the public entity or other awarding body, on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, a report
 demonstrating compliance with this chapter. The required monthly report demonstrating compliance with this chapter shall include the full name of, and identify the apprenticeship program name, location, and graduation date of, each worker relied upon to satisfy the apprenticeship graduation percentage requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 2601.

(b) If the contractor, bidder, or other entity fails to provide the monthly report required by this section, or provides a report that is incomplete, the public agency or other awarding body shall withhold further payments until a complete report is provided. If a monthly report